Texas, session 892, HB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  (a) In this section, "council" means the Climate Change Impact Assessment Council established by this Act. (b)  The council is established to study the impact of climate change on the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this state. (c)  The council is composed of the following members: (1)  two members of the senate appointed by the lieutenant governor; (2)  two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and (3)  seven members of the public appointed jointly by the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives, including: (A)  one member with expertise in climatology; (B)  one member with expertise in this state's economy; (C)  one member with expertise in land management and natural resource maintenance; and (D)  one member representing the tourism industry. (d)  A public member of the council is entitled to reimbursement of the travel expenses incurred by the member while conducting the business of the council, as provided by the General Appropriations Act. (e)  Each legislative standing committee with primary jurisdiction over environmental regulation shall provide any needed personnel and administrative support to the council. (f)  The council shall conduct a study to: (1)  assess the current and potential effects of climate change trends on the residents, natural resources, public health, and economy of this state; (2)  estimate the costs to this state of adverse effects associated with climate change; (3)  research measures for preventing or mitigating the effects of flooding, erosion, drought, and wildfires that may be caused or worsened by climate change; and (4)  recommend legislation or other regulations to minimize the adverse impact of climate change on this state. (g)  The council shall hold public hearings in various parts of this state to gather information related to the study described in Subsection (f) of this section. (h)  Not later than January 1, 2027, the council shall prepare and submit a report to the legislature containing the results of the study described in Subsection (f) of this section. (i)  The council is abolished and this Act expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  Not later than March 1, 2026, the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint members to the Climate Change Impact Assessment Council as required by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.